src/noun-nob-morph.txt
! ====================== !
! Bokmål noun morphology !
! ====================== !

! Declension classes
! Main types, from Bokmålsordboka

! f1  bru         brua        bruer       bruene
! f2  pumpe       pumpa       pumper      pumpene
! m1  stol        stolen      stoler      stolene
!     bakke       bakken      bakker      bakkene
!     pumpe       pumpen      pumper      pumpene
! m2  lærer       læreren     lærere      lærerne
! m3  bever       beveren     bevere      beverne
!                             bevre(r)    bevrene
! n1  slott       slottet     slott       slotta/slottene
! n2  eple        eplet       epler       epla/eplene
!     salt        saltet      salter      salta/saltene
! n3  kontor      kontoret    kontor      kontora
!                             kontorer    kontorene
!     høve        høvet       høve/høver  høva/høvene
! n4  salt        saltet      salter      salta/saltene ??
! n5  middel      midlet      midler      midla/midlene ??

! Subtypes, mainly from Finsk-norsk ordbok, also system-specific

! x  unclassified, to m1 by default
! mX indecl
! m1sg sg only
! m1b dam
! m1b fe, komite
! miV sko pl. sko
! m3V meter pl. meter
! KOLLEGA kollegaer, kolleger
! KONTO kontoer, konti
! RADIUS radiuser, radii
! BROR brødre
! FAR fedre
! MANN menn

! DATTER døtre
! f1b skam
! f1X bok pl. bøker
! f1V mus, pl. mus

! n1b rom pl. rom
! n1s sg only
! n2b program pl. programmer
! n2c kontor pl. kontor, kontorer
! n2s mørke, not pl.
! n3b lager def. lageret
! n3c fe, feet
! n4b faktum pl fakta
! LEKSIKON leksikon, pl. leksika
! MUSEUM museum, museet, museer



! Basic paradigms
! ===============

! Masculines
! ----------

LEXICON x 
+X: m1 ; !Temporarily excluding the xX
! m1 ;     ! change line back if needed.

LEXICON mX
 +N+Msc: K ;
 +N:  R ;

LEXICON m1 ! dag, hane
 +N+Msc+Sg: 0-en ;
 +N+Msc+Pl: er-ene ;
 +N+Msc+Pl+Nynorsk: ar-ane ;
 +N:  R ;

LEXICON m1sg ! bruk
  +N+Msc+Sg: 0-en ;
 +N:  R ;

LEXICON m1X
 +N+Msc+Sg: 0-en ;
 +N+Msc+Pl:Z1 er-ene ;
 +N+Msc+Pl+Nynorsk:Z1 ar-ane ;
 +N:  R ;

LEXICON m1b ! dam
 +N+Msc+Sg:mX4 0-en ;
 +N+Msc+Pl:m er-ene ;
 +N+Msc+Pl+Nynorsk:m ar-ane ;
 +N:  R ;

LEXICON m1c ! fe, komite
 +N+Msc+Sg: 0-en ;
 +N+Msc+Pl: er-ene ;
 +N+Msc+Pl+Nynorsk: ar-ane ;
 +N:  R ;

LEXICON m1V ! sko
 +N+Msc+Sg: 0-en ;
 +N+Msc+Pl: 0-ene ;
 +N+Msc+Pl+Nynorsk: 0-a ;
 +N:  R ;

LEXICON m2 ! lærer
 +N+Msc+Sg: 0-en ;
 +N+Msc+Pl: e-ne ;
 +N+Msc+Sg:%^NYNAG 0-en ;
 +N+Msc+Pl:%^NYNAG ar-ane ;
 +N:  R ;

LEXICON m3 ! onkel
 +N+Msc+Sg: 0-en ;
 +N+Msc+Pl:X1 er-ene ; ! X1 deletes the vowel -e-
 +N+Msc+Pl+Nynorsk:X1 ar-ane ; ! X1 deletes the vowel -e-
 +N:  R ;

LEXICON m3V ! meter
 +N+Msc+Sg: 0-en ;
 +N+Msc+Pl:X1 0-ene ;
 +N+Msc+Pl:X1 0-ane ;
 +N:  R ;

LEXICON KOLLEGA
 +N+Msc+Sg: 0-en ;
 +N+Msc+Pl:X2 er-ene ; ! delete a, kolleger
 +N+Msc+Pl: er-ene ;   ! keep a, kollegaer 
 +N:  R ;
 
LEXICON KONTO
 +N+Msc+Sg: 0-en K ;
 +N+Msc+Pl:X2i 0-ene ; ! delete o
 +N+Msc+Pl: er-ene ; ! Regular pl
 +N+Msc+Pl+Nynorsk: ar-ane ; ! Regular pl
 +N:  R ;
 
LEXICON RADIUS
 +N+Msc+Sg:%>us 0-en ;
 +N+Msc+Sg+Def:%>en K ; ! short def
 +N+Msc+Pl: er-ene ; ! Regular pl
 +N+Msc+Pl+Nynorsk: ar-ane ; ! Regular pl
 +N:  R ;
 
LEXICON BROR
 bror+N+Msc+Sg:bror 0-en ;
 bror+N+Msc+Pl:brødr e-ene ; 
 bror+N+Msc+Pl+Nynorsk:brør 0-ne ; 

LEXICON BRODER
 broder+N+Msc+Sg:broder 0-en ;
 broder+N+Msc+Pl:brødr e-ene ; 
 broder+N+Msc+Pl+Nynorsk:brør 0-ne ; 

LEXICON FAR
 far+N+Msc+Sg:far 0-en ;
 far+N+Msc+Pl:fedr e-ene ; 
! +N:  R ;
 
LEXICON DATTER
 +N+Fem+Sg+Indef:datter # ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Def:datra # ;
 +N+Msc+Sg+Def:datteren # ;
! +N+Fem+Sg+Def+Radical:datra # ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Indef:døtre # ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Def:døtrene # ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Nynorsk+Indef:dotter # ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Nynorsk+Def:dotra # ;
! +N:  R ;

LEXICON MOR
 mor+N+Fem+Sg:mor 0-a ;
 mor+N+Msc+Sg+Def:moren K ;
 mor+N+Fem+Pl:mødr e-ene ; 

LEXICON GÅS
 gås+N+Fem+Sg:gås 0-a ;
 gås+N+Msc+Sg+Def:gåsen K ;
 gås+N+Fem+Pl:gjess 0-ene ; 

LEXICON KU
 ku+N+Fem+Sg:ku 0-a ;
 ku+N+Msc+Sg+Def:kuen K ;
 ku+N+Fem+Pl:kyr 0-a ; 
 ku+N+Fem+Pl:ku er-ene ; 

LEXICON KLE
 kle+N+Neu+Sg+Indef:kle K ;
 kle+N+Neu+Sg+Def:kledet K ;
 kle+N+Neu+Pl:klæ r-rne ; 


LEXICON MANN
 +N+Msc+Sg: 0-en ;
 +N+Msc+Pl:Z1 0-ene ;
! +N:  R ;

LEXICON indeclm !mX, eigentleg.
 +N+Msc+Indcl: # ;
! +N:  R ;

! Feminines
! ---------

LEXICON fx ! Former vx, awaiting classification.
 f1 ;

LEXICON fX ! førehand
 +N+Fem+Sg+Indef: # ;

LEXICON f1 ! myr, krone
 +N+Fem+Sg: 0-a ;
 +N+Msc+Sg: en ; ! myren !^C^
 +N+Fem+Pl: er-ene ;
 +N:  R ;

LEXICON f1sg ! grisetang
 +N+Fem+Sg: 0-a ;
 +N+Msc+Sg: en ; ! myren !^C^

LEXICON f1b ! skam
 +N+Fem+Sg:mX4 0-a ;
 +N+Msc+Sg:m en ; ! myren !^C^
 +N+Fem+Pl:m er-ene ;
 +N:  R ;

LEXICON f1X ! bok
 +N+Fem+Sg: 0-a ;
 +N+Msc+Sg: en ; ! boken !^C^
 +N+Fem+Pl:Z1 er-ene ;
 +N:  R ;

LEXICON f1V ! mus
 +N+Fem+Sg: 0-a ;
 +N+Msc+Sg: en ; ! musen !^C^
 +N+Fem+Pl: 0-ene ;
 +N:  R ;

LEXICON f2
 f1 ;
 
LEXICON f3 ! lever
 +N+Fem+Sg:X1 0-a ;
 +N+Msc+Sg: en ; ! levren !^C^
 +N+Fem+Pl:X1 er-ene ;
 +N:  R ;

! Neuters
! -------

LEXICON nX ! styrbord
 +N+Neu: K ;
 +N:  R ;

LEXICON n1 ! hus
 +N+Neu+Sg: 0-et ;
 +N+Neu+Pl: 0-ene-a ;
 +N:  R ;

LEXICON n1b ! rom
 +N+Neu+Sg:mX4 0-et ;
 +N+Neu+Pl:m 0-ene-a ;
 +N:  R ;

LEXICON n1sg ! yr
 +N+Neu+Sg: 0-et ;
 +N:  R ;

LEXICON n2 ! eple, salt
 +N+Neu+Sg: 0-et ;
 +N+Neu+Pl: er-ene ;
 +N:  R ;

LEXICON n2b ! program
 +N+Neu+Sg:mX4 0-et ;
 +N+Neu+Pl:m 0-er-ene ;
 +N:  R ;

LEXICON n2c ! album, kontor
 +N+Neu+Sg: 0-et ;
 +N+Neu+Pl: 0-er-ene ;
 +N:  R ;

LEXICON n2s ! mørke
 +N+Neu+Sg: 0-et ;
 +N:  R ;

LEXICON n3 ! middel
 +N+Neu+Sg:X1 0-et ;
 +N+Neu+Pl:X1 er-ene ;
 +N:  R ;

LEXICON n3b ! lager
 +N+Neu+Sg: 0-et ;
 +N+Neu+Pl:X1 e-ene ;
 +N:  R ;

LEXICON n3c ! fe
 +N+Neu+Sg: 0-et ;
 +N+Neu+Pl: 0-ne ;
 +N:  R ;

LEXICON n4 ! kriterium
 +N+Neu+Sg:X5 0-et ;
 +N+Neu+Pl:X5 er-ene ;
 +N:  R ;

LEXICON n4b ! faktum
 +N+Neu+Sg: 0-et ;
 +N+Neu+Pl:X5 a-aene ;
 +N:  R ;

LEXICON LEKSIKON ! leksikon
 +N+Neu+Sg:on 0-et ;
 +N+Neu+Pl: a-aene ;
 +N:  R ;

LEXICON MUSEUM
 +N+Neu+Sg:um 0-et ;
 +N+Neu+Pl: er-ene ;
 +N:  R ;

LEXICON KLÆR
 +N+Neu:klær 0-ne ;
 
 LEXICON TRE
 +N+Neu+Sg:tre 0-et ;
 +N+Neu+Pl:træ r-rne ;


! Lexica for definiteness declension
! ==================================

LEXICON a-aene
 +Indef:%>a K ;
 +Def:%>aene K ;

LEXICON e-ne
 +Indef:%>e K ;
 +Def:%>ne K ;

LEXICON e-ene
 +Indef:%>e K ;
 +Def:%>ene K ;
 
LEXICON er-ene
 +Indef:%>er K ;
 +Def:%>ene K ;

LEXICON ar-ane	 !! @CODE@ for nynorsk only.
 +Indef:%>ar K ; !! 
 +Def:%>ane K ;	 !! 

LEXICON 0-ane !! @CODE@ for nynorsk only.
 +Indef: K ;
 +Def:%>ane K ;

LEXICON r-rne  ! trær
 +Indef:%>r K ;
 +Def:%>rne K ;

LEXICON 0-a
 +Indef: K ;
 +Def:%>a K ;
! +Def+Radical:%>a K ; ! If needed

LEXICON 0-en
 +Indef: K ;
 +Def:%>en K ;

LEXICON 0-ene
 +Indef: K ;
 +Def:%>ene K ;

LEXICON 0-er-ene
 +Indef: K ;
 +Indef:%>er K ;
 +Def:%>ene K ;

LEXICON 0-ne
 +Indef: K ;
 +Def:%>ne K ;

LEXICON 0-et
 +Indef: K ;
 +Def:%>et K ;

LEXICON 0-ene-a
 +Indef: K ;
 +Def:%>ene K ;
 +Def:%>a K ;
! +Def+Radical:%>a K ; ! If needed

LEXICON en ! Use 0-en instead
! +Indef: K ;  ! commented out for dict, comment 
               ! in again for eventual syntax ("en dør")
 +Def:%>en K ; ! døren = dør+N+Msc :-/
